Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 06. The Director of Insurance.

Administrative Code. —

For miscellaneous provisions relating to insurance, see 3 AAC 31.

Sec. 21.06.010.
Appointment of director.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development shall appoint the director, division of insurance, Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development. The director serves at the pleasure of the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 21.06.020.
Division of insurance.

There is created within the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development a division of insurance, which shall be located in or convenient to the office occupied by the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development.

The division of insurance shall be under the administrative control of the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development and the supervision of the director of the division of insurance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 21.06.030.
Deputies and assistants; volunteers.

The director may appoint a chief deputy, who shall be in charge of the division of insurance under the direction and control of the director.

The director may appoint additional deputies for purposes designated by the director.

The director may employ a competent insurance actuary to perform actuarial duties, if any, of the division, to take charge of or assist in the examination of insurers, and to perform other assigned duties.

The director may appoint or employ examiners to conduct or assist in examinations provided for under this title as may be competent because of experience or special education or training to fulfill the responsibilities of an insurance examiner.

The director may appoint and employ a field investigator whose primary duty is to make investigations in this state of violations or claimed violations of this title.

The director may appoint a chief clerk for the division, and employ other assistants and clerks necessary to discharge the duties of the director under this title.

The director may contract for and procure, on a fee or part-time basis, or both, actuarial, technical, or other professional services required for the discharge of the director’s duties.

A volunteer member of an advisory committee who has been appointed by the director under a provision of this title to assist and advise the director on issues or matters concerning a specific area of insurance is not entitled to payment of per diem or travel expenses authorized under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For annuity contract disclosures, see 3 AAC 26, art. 6.

Sec. 21.06.040.
Prohibited interests, rewards. [Repealed, § 47 ch 29 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 21.06.050.
Delegation of authority.

The director may delegate to a deputy, assistant, examiner, or employee of the division the exercise or discharge in the director’s name of a power, duty, or function, whether ministerial or discretionary, vested by this title in the director.

The director is responsible for the official acts of a deputy, assistant, examiner, or employee of the director acting in the name of and by the authority of the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For annuity contract disclosures, see 3 AAC 26, art. 6.

Sec. 21.06.060.
Records.

The director shall enter in permanent form records of official transactions, examinations, investigations, and proceedings and keep those records in the office of the director. The records and insurance filings in the office of the director are open to public inspection, except as otherwise provided in (b) — (g) of this section or other provisions of this title with respect to particular records or filings.

Information and records, including written documents and electronic data, designated as confidential or not available for public inspection under this section or other provisions of this title

are not subject to inspection and copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.220

;

may not be obtained from the director by subpoena, except for a subpoena issued by a state or federal law enforcement agency or grand jury;

may be used by the director in a regulatory or legal proceeding; and

may be released for public inspection if the person who provided the information or records to the director consents or releases incomplete or misleading information on the same topic to the public.

The director or a person acting under the authority of the director who receives information or records designated in this title as confidential or not available for public inspection may not be permitted or required to testify about the information or records in a civil action not involving the state or a state agency, officer, or employee.

A person required or requested to provide information or records to the director under this title does not waive a claim of privilege that the person may have by providing the information or records to the director.

In the performance of duties under this title, the director may

disclose confidential information or records to the legislature, state, federal, and international regulatory or law enforcement agencies, or the National Association of Insurance Commissioners if the recipient will maintain the confidentiality of the information or records;

receive information or records from state, federal, and international regulatory or law enforcement authorities or the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and maintain the confidentiality of the information or records if requested to do so or given notice that the information or records are confidential under the law of the jurisdiction supplying them; and

enter into agreements consistent with this section governing the sharing of information or records that are confidential under this title with other state, federal, and international regulatory or law enforcement agencies or the National Association of Insurance Commissioners for the purpose of furthering any regulatory or legal action that may be taken as part of the recipient’s official duties.

The following information or records submitted to or obtained by the director are confidential:

personally identifiable consumer information; however, the director may disclose the information or records for the purpose of attempting to resolve a consumer complaint;

information or records established by a showing satisfactory to the director to be a trade secret or proprietary business information, including

detailed health insurance claim cost data; and

justification for usual, customary, and reasonable charge determinations;

information or records provided by a person not subject to this title at the request of the director if the information or records are identified as confidential by the director; and

analysis ratios and examination synopses concerning insurance companies that are submitted to the director by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

The director may withhold information or records from public inspection for as long as the director finds the withholding is

necessary to protect a person against unwarranted injury; or

in the public interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 2, 3 ch 38 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 2009)

Administrative Code. —

For financial examination of and annual audit reporting requirements for admitted insurers, see 3 AAC 21, art. 7.

Sec. 21.06.070.
Evidence.

A copy of a record or document in the office of the director that is certified as a true copy by the director shall be received in evidence in any court as if it were the original.

The director shall furnish upon request a certificate as to the authority of a person to transact insurance. The certificate is evidence of the facts set out in the certificate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Cross references. —

For rules of court relating to public records, see Evid.
R. 1005.

Sec. 21.06.080.
General powers, duties; catastrophes.

The director shall enforce the provisions of this title, and shall execute the duties imposed by this title.

The director has the power and authority expressly conferred by or reasonably implied from the provisions of this title.

The director may conduct examinations and investigations of insurance matters, in addition to examinations and investigations expressly authorized, considered proper to determine whether any person has violated a provision of this title or to secure information useful in the lawful administration of its provisions.

If the director determines that a catastrophe has occurred in this state and in good faith believes that the governor or the President of the United States has issued or is about to issue a declaration of disaster, the director may take the action that the director considers necessary to assure that a contract of insurance already issued will be honored under the terms of the contract. Actions that the director may take include emergency orders permitting the immediate licensing of adjusters to facilitate handling of claims, permitting a licensee to open or close an office, permitting a licensee to move or remove a record as required by the existence of the catastrophe, or permitting the issuance by an insurer of checks or drafts drawn on an out-of-state bank in payment of a claim. Until a declaration of the disaster has been lifted, the director may take action to respond to a disaster without a hearing. An action taken under this subsection may not remain in effect more than six months from the date that the director determines that a catastrophe has occurred unless, after a hearing, the director determines that the action is still necessary to respond to the disaster.

The director has such additional powers and duties as may be provided by other laws of this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 5 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e). Relettered in 1995, at which time former subsection (d) was relettered as (e).

Sec. 21.06.085.
Uniform data and procedures for health claims.

The director shall adopt by regulation uniform claims forms, uniform standards, and uniform procedures for the processing of data relating to billing for and payment of health care services provided to state residents. A health care insurer shall use the uniform claims forms and comply with the uniform standards and procedures established under this section.

In this section,

“health care insurer” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“health care services” has the meaning given in AS

21.86.900

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 125 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1997, paragraph (b)(1) was renumbered as (b)(2) and paragraph (b)(2) was renumbered as (b)(1) in order to maintain alphabetical order.

Administrative Code. —

For uniform claim forms, see 3 AAC 28, art. 8.

Sec. 21.06.087.
Insurance report.

History.

[Repealed, § 64 ch 41 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 21.06.090.
Regulations.

The director may adopt reasonable regulations to effectuate this title. A regulation may not extend, modify, or conflict with any law of this state or the reasonable implications thereof. Except for regulations adopted under AS

21.06.250

, a regulation affecting a person or matter other than the personnel or the internal affairs of the director’s office shall be adopted or amended only after a hearing, of which notice was given as required by AS

21.06.200

. If reasonably possible the director shall set out the proposed regulation or amendment in or with the notice of hearing. A regulation or amendment as to which a hearing is required is not effective until it has been on file as a public record in the director’s office for at least 10 days.

In addition to any other penalty provided, wilful violation of a regulation subjects the violator to the administrative penalty prescribed for that violation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For insurance holding companies, see 3 AAC 21, art. 1.

For investments, see 3 AAC 21, art. 2.

For record and financial reporting, see 3 AAC 21, art. 3.

For definition of standards and director’s authority for companies deemed to be in an impaired financial condition, see 3 AAC 21, art. 4.

For frequency and method of premium tax payments, see 3 AAC 21, art. 5.

For reinsurance, see 3 AAC 21, art. 6.

For financial examination of and annual audit reporting requirements for admitted insurers, see 3 AAC 21, art. 7.

For actuarial opinion and memorandum, see 3 AAC 21, art. 8.

For custodian of insurer assets, see 3 AAC 21, art. 9.

For licensing requirements, see 3 AAC 23, art. 1.

For premium financing, see 3 AAC 23, art. 2.

For fiduciary responsibilities of licensees, see 3 AAC 23, art. 4.

For bail bonds, see 3 AAC 23, art. 5.

For risk retention groups, see 3 AAC 24, art. 1.

For purchasing groups, see 3 AAC 24, art. 2.

For surplus lines — unauthorized insurers, see 3 AAC 25.

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

For unfair discrimination, see 3 AAC 26, art. 2.

For coverage for attorney fees taxable as costs against an insured according to Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 82, see 3 AAC 26, art. 3.

For privacy of consumer financial and health information, see 3 AAC 26, art. 4.

For annuity contract disclosures, see 3 AAC 26, art. 6.

For suitability in annuity contract transactions, see 3 AAC 26, art. 6.

For life insurance policy and annuity contract replacements, see 3 AAC 26, art. 7.

For title insurance, see 3 AAC 27, art. 1.

For variable contracts, see 3 AAC 28, art. 1.

For consumer credit insurance, see 3 AAC 28, art. 4.

For health insurance marketed as medicare supplements, see 3 AAC 28, art. 5.

For group health insurance, see 3 AAC 28, art. 6.

For mortality tables, see 3 AAC 28, art. 7.

For uniform claim forms, see 3 AAC 28, art. 8.

For life insurance policy illustrations, see 3 AAC 28, art. 9.

For rate and rating plan filings, see 3 AAC 29, art. 2.

For group-marketed property and casualty insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 3.

For motor vehicle liability insurance senior discount, see 3 AAC 29, art. 4.

For schedule and individual risk rating plans, see 3 AAC 29, art. 5.

For information filings for commercial insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 6.

For assigned risk pool, see 3 AAC 30, art. 1.

For premium installment payments, see 3 AAC 30, art. 2.

For workers’ compensation review and advisory committee, see 3 AAC 30, art. 3.

For fees, see 3 AAC 31, art. 1.

For filing procedure for forms, rates, manuals, rating plans, and rules, see 3 AAC 31, art. 2.

For viatical settlements, see 3 AAC 31, art. 3.

Sec. 21.06.100.
Orders, notices.

Orders and notices of the director are not effective unless in writing signed by or under the authority of the director.

Every order must state its effective date and must concisely state

its intent or purpose;

the grounds on which it is based;

the provisions of this title under which the action is taken or proposed to be taken; the failure of an order to designate a particular provision of this title does not deprive the director of the right to rely on the particular provision.

Except as may be provided in this title respecting particular procedures, an order or notice may be given by delivery to the person to be ordered or notified or by mailing it, postage prepaid, addressed to the person at the principal place of business as last of record in the director’s office. A mailed order or notice is considered given when mailed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.06.110.
Director’s annual report.

As early in each calendar year as is reasonably possible, the director shall prepare and deliver an annual report to the commissioner, who shall notify the legislature that the report is available, showing, with respect to the preceding calendar year,

a list of the authorized insurers transacting insurance in this state, with a summary of their financial statement as the director considers appropriate;

the name of each insurer whose certificate of authority was surrendered, suspended, or revoked during the year and the cause of surrender, suspension, or revocation;

the name of each insurer authorized to do business in this state against which delinquency or similar proceedings were instituted and, if against an insurer domiciled in this state, a concise statement of the facts with respect to each proceeding and its present status;

a statement in regard to examination of rating organizations, advisory organizations, joint underwriters, and joint reinsurers as required by AS

21.39.120

;

the receipt and expenses of the division for the year;

recommendations of the director as to amendments or supplementation of laws affecting insurance or the office of director;

statistical information regarding health insurance, including the number of individual and group policies sold or terminated in the state; this paragraph does not authorize the director to require an insurer to release proprietary information;

the annual percentage of health claims paid in the state that meets the requirements of AS

21.36.495(a)

and (d);

the total amount of contributions reported and the total amount of credit claimed under AS

21.96.070

;

the total number of public comments received and the director’s efforts, to the extent allowable by law, to improve or maintain public access to information on individual health insurance rate filings before they become effective; and

other pertinent information and matters the director considers proper.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 41 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 92 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 2016; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2018)

Delayed repeal of paragraph (9) in 2025. —

Under secs. 1 and 37, ch. 61, SLA 2014, as amended by sec. 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, paragraph (9) of this section is repealed January 1, 2025.

Revisor's notes. —

In 2010, in paragraph (8), “AS

21.36.495

(a) and (d)” was substituted for “AS

21.36.128

(a) and (d)” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

21.36.128

.

In 2010, in paragraph (9), “AS

21.96.070

and

21.96.075

” was substituted for “AS 21.89.070 and

21.89.075

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of those sections.

Under sec. 1, ch. 62, SLA 2018, paragraph (9) was repealed.
Under sec. 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, the delayed repeal of paragraph (9) by sec. 37. ch. 61, SLA 2014, was extended to 2025.
To reconcile these provisions, the repeal by ch. 62 was treated as an amendment of paragraph (9) that deleted the reference to AS

21.96.075

, which was also repealed by sec. 1, ch. 62, SLA 2018.
This treatment is in accord with the revisor's instruction provided in sec. 38(a), ch. 101, SLA 2018.

In 2025, under secs. 1 and 37, ch. 61, SLA 2014, as amended by sec. 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, the amendment to paragraph (9) by those sections to remove a reference to AS

21.96.070

will be treated as a repeal of paragraph (9) due to the 2018 repeal of AS

21.96.075

and its removal from paragraph (9) (see the earlier 2018 revisor's note).
This treatment is in accord with the revisor's instruction provided in sec. 38(b), ch. 101, SLA 2018, which provides that “the revisor of statutes shall treat the removal of the cross references to AS

21.96.070

in…AS

21.06.110

(9)…as a repeal of…AS

21.06.110

(9)”.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, added (10) and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (9), following “AS

21.96.070

” deleted “and

21.96.075

”.

Sec. 21.06.115.
Duty to inform public.

The director shall regularly inform the public of matters concerning the purchase, price, coverage, benefits, and rights of insurance marketed in this state and make available information on availability of the services of the division of insurance.
The director shall prepare, publish, and revise as it becomes useful or necessary to do so, an information pamphlet on insurance and the rights of a consumer of insurance and on how to take advantage of the services of the division of insurance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1976)

Sec. 21.06.120.
Examination of insurers.

The director may examine the affairs, transactions, accounts, records, and assets of each authorized and formerly authorized insurer and each licensed and formerly licensed managing general agent, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, surplus lines broker, and surplus lines association as often as the director considers advisable. In scheduling and determining the nature, scope, and frequency of examinations, the director may consider any factor or material that the director determines is appropriate, including the results of financial statement analysis and ratios, competency of management or change of ownership, actuarial opinions, reports of independent certified public accountants, number and nature of consumer complaints, results of prior examinations, frequency of prior violations of statute and regulation, and criteria set out in the most recent edition of the Financial Condition Examiners Handbook and the Market Regulation Handbook approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and in effect when the director conducts an examination. Examination of an alien insurer may be limited to its insurance transactions and affairs in the United States. Examination of a reciprocal insurer may also include examination of its attorney-in-fact to the extent that the transactions of the attorney-in-fact relate to the insurer.

The director shall in like manner examine each insurer applying for an initial certificate of authority to do business in this state.

In place of an examination by the director, the director may accept a full report of the last recent examination of a foreign or alien insurer, issued by the insurance supervisory official of another state, territory, commonwealth, or district of the United States. The director may require that the

insurance regulatory agency conducting the examination be, at the time of the examination, accredited by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners;

examination be performed under the supervision of an insurance regulatory agency accredited by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners; and the supervising examiner, after a review of the examination work papers and report, state under oath that the examination and report comply with the standards and procedures required by their accredited state insurance regulatory agency; or

examiner conducting the examination be employed by an insurance regulatory agency accredited at the time of the examination by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and that the examiner, after review of the examination work papers and report, state under oath that the examination and report comply with the standards and procedures required by the accredited insurance regulatory agency.

The director may examine insurers in participation with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

The director may use a contract examiner to carry out the functions of this section. The selection of a contract examiner and the award of a contract is subject to AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code), except when the director makes a written determination that an emergency selection and contract award is necessary.

For the purpose of completing an examination of a person under this title, the director may examine or investigate any person, or the business of any person, if the director determines that the examination or investigation is necessary or material to the examination of the person.

The director shall examine a domestic insurer at least once every three years. The director may examine a domestic insurer at any time when the director determines that an examination or investigation is necessary. Unless the director determines an insurer is in danger of becoming impaired, when the director intends to conduct an interim examination of a domestic insurer covering the same subjects that were included in the scope of the last examination report, the director shall give at least 10 days prior written notice stating the scope and purpose of the examination. In this subsection, “interim examination” means an examination of a domestic insurer that occurs within three years after the start of the domestic insurer’s last examination.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 117 SLA 1984; am §§ 1, 2 ch 50 SLA 1990; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 6 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 96 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For record and financial reporting, see 3 AAC 21, art. 3.

For financial examination of and annual audit reporting requirements for admitted insurers, see 3 AAC 21, art. 7.

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

For assigned risk pool, see 3 AAC 30, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (a), substituted “most recent edition of the Financial Condition Examiners Handbook and the Market Regulation Handbook approved” for “Examiners’ Handbook most recently approved”.

Sec. 21.06.130.
Examination of producers, adjusters, and promoters.

To determine compliance with this title, the director may, as often as the director has reasonable cause, examine or require a written report from a person of the accounts, records, documents, and transactions pertaining to or affecting the insurance affairs or proposed insurance affairs of

an insurance producer or independent adjuster; or

a person engaged in or proposing to be engaged in or assisting in the promotion or formation of a domestic insurer or insurance holding corporation, or corporation to finance a domestic insurer or the production of its business.

[Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 117 SLA 1984; am §§ 5, 223 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

Collateral references. —

Insurer’s tort liability for acts of adjuster seeking to obtain settlement or release. 39 ALR3d 739.

Sec. 21.06.140.
Conduct of examination.

The director shall conduct the examination at the home office of a domestic, foreign, or Canadian insurer, or the United States branch office of an alien insurer, or in any of its branch or agency offices; or with respect to persons other than insurers, at the office or other place or places where the records are kept.

Every person being examined, or from whom information is sought, and its officers, employees, agents, and representatives shall provide to the director timely, convenient, and free access, at all reasonable hours at its office, the books, accounts, records, documents, files, information, assets, and matters in their possession or control relating to the subject of the examination, including all computer or other recordings relating to the property, assets, business, and affairs of the person being examined, and shall facilitate and aid the examination as far as it is in their power to do so, including providing to the director, at the expense of the person being examined, a copy of any document requested during the examination. The director may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew a license or authority of a person engaging in the business of insurance or other business under the jurisdiction of the director if the person or an officer, director, employee, or agent of the person refuses to submit to examination or to comply with a reasonable written request of an examiner.

If the director finds financial or other records to be inadequate or inadequately kept or posted or if an insurer’s financial records are not kept as required by the Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual currently approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners after the director has issued an order citing the inadequacy of the accounts and given a reasonable opportunity to complete or correct the accounting, the director may employ experts to rewrite, post, or balance them at the expense of the person being examined.

When conducting an examination under this section, the director may retain attorneys, appraisers, independent actuaries, independent certified public accountants, or other professionals and specialists as examiners, the reasonable cost of which shall be paid by the person being examined under AS

21.06.160(a)

.

As far as practical the director shall conduct the examination of a foreign or alien insurer in cooperation with the insurance supervisory officials of other states in which the insurer transacts business, and for this purpose the director may participate in joint examinations of insurers or be represented at an examination by an examiner of another state.

In conducting an examination under this section, the examiner shall observe at a minimum those guidelines and procedures set out in the most recent edition of the Financial Condition Examiners Handbook and the Market Regulation Handbook approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners that are consistent with this title.

An examiner may not be appointed by the director if the examiner, either directly or indirectly, has a conflict of interest or is affiliated with the management of or owns a pecuniary interest in a person subject to examination under this title. This section may not be construed to automatically preclude an examiner from being, in the ordinary course of business,

a policyholder or claimant under an insurance policy;

a grantor of a mortgage or similar instrument on the examiner’s residence to a regulated entity if obtained under customary terms;

an investment owner in shares of regulated mutual fund companies; or

a settlor or beneficiary of a blind trust into which otherwise impermissible holdings have been placed.

The director may terminate or suspend an examination in order to pursue other legal or regulatory action under this title.

In a judicial or administrative proceeding a factual determination made in an examination report approved under AS

21.06.150(b)(1)

is prima facie evidence of the fact.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 50 SLA 1990; am §§ 6 — 9 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For financial examination of and annual audit reporting requirements for admitted insurers, see 3 AAC 21, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (f), substituted “most recent edition of the Financial Condition Examiners Handbook and the Market Regulation Handbook approved” for “Examiners’ Handbook most recently approved”.

Sec. 21.06.150.
Examination reports.

An examination report may only consist of facts appearing upon the books, records, or other documents of the examined person, the person’s agents, or other persons examined, or facts determined from the testimony of officers, agents, or other persons examined concerning the person’s affairs, and the conclusions and recommendations that the examiners find reasonably warranted from the facts.

The examiner shall file with the division a written report of an examination, signed by the examiner under oath, not later than 60 days following the last day of examination field work. The period for filing the report may be extended for 60 additional days upon approval of the director. Upon receipt of the report, the division shall transmit the report to the person being examined, together with a notice that gives the person being examined a period of 30 days to make a written submission or rebuttal with respect to matters contained in the examination report. Within 30 days of the end of the period allowed for the receipt of written submissions or rebuttals, the director shall fully consider and review the report, together with any written submissions or rebuttals, and any relevant portions of the examiner’s work papers and enter an order

approving the examination report as filed or approving the examination report with modification or corrections;

rejecting the examination report with directions to the examiners to reopen the examination for the purpose of obtaining additional data, documentation, or information and refiling the report under this section; or

setting an investigatory hearing under the procedures of AS

21.06.200

and

21.06.210(a)

— (d) for purposes of obtaining additional information and testimony.

In the event the director determines that regulatory action is appropriate as a result of an examination, the director may enter orders and initiate proceedings as provided by law. The director may use an examination report, work papers or other documents, the testimony of the examiners, or other information discovered or developed during the course of an examination in a judicial or administrative proceeding, whether or not a written report of the examination at the time has been made, transmitted, or approved by the director.

The director may disclose the content of an examination report, preliminary examination report or results, or a matter relating to it to the insurance division of this or another state or country and to law enforcement officers of this or another jurisdiction. Except as allowed by this section or other provision of law, the director may not disclose the contents of a preliminary examination report before the report is filed in the office of the director under AS

21.06.060

.

An order entered under (b)(1) of this section must be accompanied by findings of fact and conclusions of law resulting from the director’s consideration and review of the examination report, relevant examiner work papers, and written submissions or rebuttals.

Within 30 days of the receipt of the approved report, the person examined shall file affidavits executed by each director and the chief executive officer or equivalent officer stating under oath that they have received and reviewed a copy of the approved report and related orders.

Information or records obtained by the director under AS

21.06.120

or

21.06.140

and any related work papers of an examination are confidential. The director may publish an examination report or a summary of it in a newspaper or electronic media in the state if the director determines that the publication is in the public interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 10 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 7 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 38 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For insurance holding companies, see 3 AAC 21, art. 1.

For definition of standards and director’s authority for companies deemed to be in an impaired financial condition, see 3 AAC 21, art. 4.

For financial examination of and annual audit reporting requirements for admitted insurers, see 3 AAC 21, art. 7.

For viatical settlements, see 3 AAC 31, art. 3.

Sec. 21.06.160.
Examination expense.

Each person examined, other than examinations under AS

21.06.130

and examinations of managing general agents, third-party administrators, reinsurance intermediary managers, motor vehicle service contract providers, or surplus lines brokers, shall pay a reasonable rate calculated on salary, benefit costs, and estimated division overhead for time spent directly or indirectly related to the examination. Each person examined, other than examinations under AS

21.06.130

, shall pay actual out-of-pocket business expenses, including travel expenses, incurred by division staff examiners and shall pay the compensation of a contract examiner, to be set at a reasonable customary rate, for conducting the examination upon presentation of a detailed account of the charges and expenses by the director or under an order of the director. The director may waive payment of all or part of the actual out-of-pocket business expenses incurred by division staff examiners, or the compensation of a contract examiner, if the director determines that payment of the expenses or compensation creates a financial hardship for a managing general agent, third-party administrator, reinsurance intermediary manager, motor vehicle service contract provider, or surplus lines broker. The accounting may either be presented periodically during the course of the examination or at the termination of the examination. A person may not pay and an examiner may not accept additional compensation for an examination. A person shall pay examination expenses to the division under this subsection using an electronic payment method specified by the director.

The director shall pay into the general fund of the state all money received under (a) of this section. Instead of charging and collecting the costs and expenses of the examination under (a) of this section, the director may give written authorization for the person examined to make direct payment to the contract examiner for all or part of the contract examiner’s compensation or expenses. The contract between the state and a contract examiner who will receive direct payment under this subsection must require that the examiner provide the director with a copy of each billing for the examination.

In addition to other penalties provided by this title, if the person fails to pay the charges and expenses prescribed in (a) of this section, the amount may be recovered by suit by the attorney general on behalf of the state and restored to the general fund. The amount due shall be a first lien upon all of the assets and property of the person in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 5 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 11 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 5 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 80 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For assigned risk pool, see 3 AAC 30, art. 1.

For viatical settlements, see 3 AAC 31, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (a), inserted “and examinations of managing general agents, third-party administrators, reinsurance intermediary managers, motor vehicle service contract providers, or surplus lines brokers” following “AS

21.06.130

”; added the third sentence.